Utah statutes.
62A-11-408.   Termination of income withholding.
(1) (a)  At any time after the date income withholding begins, a party to the
child support order may request a judicial hearing or administrative review to
determine whether income withholding should be terminated due to:
(i)  good cause under Section 62A-11-404;
(ii)  the execution of a written agreement under Section 62A-11-404; or
(iii)  the completion of an obligor’s support obligation.
(b)  An obligor's payment of overdue child support may not be the sole basis
for termination of income withholding.
(c)  If it is determined by a court or the office that income withholding
should be terminated, the office shall give written notice of termination to
each payor within ten days after receipt of notice of that decision.
(d)  If, after termination of income withholding by court or administrative
order, an obligor's child support obligation  becomes delinquent or subject to
immediate and automatic income withholding under Section 62A-11-404, the
office shall reinstate income withholding procedures in accordance with the
provisions of this part.
(e)  If the office terminates income withholding through an agreement with a
party, the office may reinstate income withholding if:
(i)  a delinquency occurs;
(ii)  the obligor requests reinstatement;
(iii)  the obligee requests reinstatement; or
(iv)  the office, based on internal procedures and standards, determines
reinstatement is appropriate.
(2)  The office shall give written notice of termination to each payor when
the obligor no longer owes child support to the obligee.
(3) A notice to withhold income, served by the office, is binding on a payor
until the office notifies the payor that the obligation to withhold income has
been terminated.
